Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6
Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

[Reserved.]

Subchapter 2
— Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. With Act 1230 of 1991, the General Assembly sought to delineate the respective responsibilities of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control & Ecology. Confusion on these issues in the public's perception continues, however, primarily because of the similarity in the names of these entities. The purpose of this Act is to achieve the legislative intent of Act 1230 of 1991 and to definitively assign the executive, adjudicatory, and rulemaking roles for the State's regulatory functions concerning protection of the environment.”

Cross References.

Agricultural operations, § 8-6-509.

Permit fees for air, water, and solid waste pollution control activities, § 8-1-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 15: Mar. 9, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is essential to the health, welfare and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas, and to the conservation of natural resources and the minimizing of environmental damage that adequate sites and facilities be made available promptly for the proper disposal and recycling of solid wastes; that existing practices and laws are inadequate; that this act and the implementation thereof are necessary to the accomplishment of the foregoing purposes and to the welfare of the State of Arkansas and her people. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1007, § 7: Apr. 8, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that city and county governments and solid waste authorities are not permitted to collect delinquent solid waste management system fees and service charges under the county property tax collection system which county subordinate service districts are currently authorized to use; that the use of the county property tax collection system will improve fee collection and increase revenues for county solid waste management; and that, at this time, there is an increasingly critical need to collect all necessary revenues to support the operation of city and county solid waste management systems and solid waste authorities. Therefore, in order to promote the effective collection of delinquent solid waste fees or service charges at this critical time, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1057, § 9: Apr. 9, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the 78th General Assembly that the sanctions imposed by current Arkansas law for environmental violations are among the least stringent in the nation. Thus, current law is inadequate to deter environmental violations, and in fact extends an implicit invitation to irresponsible industries. Protection of the environmental integrity of this state is essential to protect the public's health and economic well-being. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1280, § 9: Apr. 21, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some areas of the state are facing critical shortages of solid waste disposal capacity due to the difficulties in citing landfill facilities at the local level. It is found that the authority granted to municipalities and counties to adopt more restrictive standards for the location, design, construction, and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites and facilities than those adopted by the federal, state and regional laws, rules, regulations and orders has exacerbated and attenuated this crises and could thwart or jeopardize the purposes of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and its efforts to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 179, § 38: Feb. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Act 2005, No. 1824, § 20: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly of the State of Arkansas hereby finds and determines that the decision of the Arkansas Supreme Court in Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality v. Brighton Corp. 352 Ark. 396, 102 S.W.3d 458 (2003), has raised questions regarding the factual proof required to establish a claim for cost recovery under the Arkansas Remedial Action Trust Fund Act and regarding the retroactivity of the statute. The General Assembly further finds and determines that the doubts raised by the decision in the Brighton case have created substantial uncertainty regarding the enforcement authority of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality and the rights and responsibilities of private parties under the Arkansas Remedial Action Trust Fund Act, all of which require urgent resolution. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist; and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and shall apply retroactively.”

Acts 2011, No. 174, § 2: Mar. 4, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that counties face a significant risk of nonpayment when a tenant is registered as an occupant for purposes of payment of solid waste management fees and charges; that an increasing number of tenants are not paying county solid waste management fees and charges; and that this act is necessary because counties are losing an increasing amount of revenue as the result of nonpayment of fees and charges by transient tenants. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-201. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act”.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2701.

8-6-202. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this subchapter and it is declared to be the policy of this state to regulate the collection and disposal of solid wastes in a manner that will:

Protect the public health and welfare;

Prevent water or air pollution;

Prevent the spread of disease and the creation of nuisances;

Conserve natural resources; and

Enhance the beauty and quality of the environment.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2702.

8-6-203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Disposal site” means any place at which solid waste is dumped, abandoned, or accepted or disposed of for final disposition by incineration, landfilling, composting, or any other method;

“Hazardous waste” means any waste or combination of wastes of a solid, liquid, contained gaseous, or semisolid form that, because of its quantity, concentration, or physical, chemical, or infectious characteristics, may in the judgment of the Division of Environmental Quality:

Cause or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible or incapacitating reversible illness; or

Pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment if improperly treated, stored, transported, or disposed of, or otherwise improperly managed.

“Hazardous waste” includes without limitation waste that:

Is radioactive;

Is toxic;

Is corrosive;

Is flammable;

Is an irritant or a strong sensitizer; or

Generates pressure through decomposition, heat, or other means;

“Household” means a single or multiple residence, hotel or motel, bunkhouse, ranger station, crew quarters, campground, picnic ground, and day-use recreation area;

“Household hazardous waste” means any hazardous waste derived from a household that is no longer under the control of the household.

“Household hazardous waste” includes without limitation:

Household cleaners;

Gasoline;

Paint, paint strippers, and paint thinners;

Motor oil; and

Herbicides and pesticides, excluding antimicrobial and disinfectant products;

“Household hazardous waste storage or processing center” means a facility that stores, accumulates, or processes household hazardous waste.

“Household hazardous waste storage or processing center” does not include:

Hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities permitted by the division under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq.;

Facilities with an agriculture exemption under § 8-6-2019; or

De minimis amounts of household hazardous waste that have not been removed from the municipal solid waste stream;

“Municipality” means a city of the first class, a city of the second class, or an incorporated town;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, state agency, government instrumentality or agency, institution, county, city, town, municipal authority or trust, venture, or other legal entity, however organized;

“Pesticide” means a substance or mixture of substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest or for use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant.

“Pesticide” does not include:

A new animal drug as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 321(v);

An animal drug that has been determined by regulation of the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services not to be a new animal drug; or

An animal feed as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 321(w);

“Solid waste” means any garbage or refuse, sludge from a wastewater treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control facility, and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, and agricultural operations, and from community activities, but does not include solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage, or solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges that are point sources subject to permit under 33 U.S.C. § 1342, or source, special nuclear, or by-products material as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.;

“Solid waste board” or “board” means a regional solid waste management board or a solid waste service area board, or its successor, created under § 8-6-701 et seq.;

“Solid waste management system” means the entire process of source reduction, storage, collection, transportation, processing, waste minimization, recycling, and disposal of solid wastes by any person engaging in the process as a business or by any municipality, authority, trust, county, or by any combination of a municipality, authority, trust, or county; and

“Transfer station” means a facility that is used to manage the removal, compaction, and transfer of solid waste from collection vehicles and other small vehicles to greater capacity transport vehicles.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2703; Acts 1991, No. 751, §§ 1, 2; 1995, No. 547, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 61; 2011, No. 1153, § 1; 2013, No. 1127, §§ 5, 6; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2589, 2590; 2019, No. 1067, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 11, provided: “(a) The purpose of this act is to have the Environmental Compliance Resource Program operational and to make illegal dump control officers unnecessary on or before May 1, 2020.

“(b)

If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws”.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment deleted former (1) and (2), inserted present (2) through (5) and (8), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2013 amendment substituted “Is radioactive” for “Radioactive” in (2)(B)(i); substituted “Is toxic” for “Toxic” in (2)(B)(ii); substituted “Is corrosive” for “Corrosive” in (2)(B)(iii); substituted “Is flammable” for “Flammable” in (2)(B)(iv); in (2)(B)(v), substituted “Is an” for “An” and “or” for “and” at the end; substituted “Generates” for “That generate” in (2)(B)(vi); substituted “as defined in”
for “under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act” in (8)(B)(i) and (8)(B)(iii); substituted “§ 321(v)” for “301 § 201(w)” in (8)(B)(i); and substituted “§ 321(w)” for “301 § 201(x)” in (8)(B)(iii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (2)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” in (5)(B)(i).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1067 substituted “Facilities with an agriculture exemption under § 8-6-2019” for “Agricultural operations as defined in § 8-6-509” in (5)(B)(ii).

8-6-204. Criminal, civil, and administrative penalties.

Criminal Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this subchapter, who commits any unlawful act under this subchapter, or who violates any rule or order of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission or the Division of Environmental Quality shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of Arkansas law, upon conviction that person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than one (1) year or a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or subject to both such fine and imprisonment. For the purpose of fines only, each day or part of a day during which the violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

It shall be illegal for a person to:

Violate any provision of this subchapter, commit any unlawful act under this subchapter, or violate any rule or order of the commission or division, and leave the state or remove his or her person from the jurisdiction of this state;

Through the course of activities prohibited by this section, purposely, knowingly, or recklessly cause pollution of the waters or air of the state in a manner not otherwise permitted by law and thereby create a substantial likelihood of adversely affecting human health, animal or plant life, or property; or

Purposely or knowingly make any false statement, representation, or certification in any document required to be maintained under this chapter, or falsify, tamper with, or render inaccurate any monitoring device, testing method, or record required to be maintained under this chapter.

A person who violates this subdivision (a)(2) shall be guilty of a felony.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of Arkansas law, upon conviction that person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than five (5) years or a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or subject to both such fine and imprisonment. For the purpose of fines only, each day or part of a day during which the violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

Notwithstanding the limits on fines set in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section, if a person convicted under subdivision (a)(1) or subdivision (a)(2) of this section has derived or will derive pecuniary gain from commission of the offenses, then he or she may be sentenced to pay a fine not to exceed two (2) times the amount of the pecuniary gain.

Civil Penalties. The division is authorized to institute a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction to accomplish any or all of the following:

Restrain any violation of or compel compliance with the provisions of this subchapter and of any rules, orders, permits, licenses, or plans issued pursuant to this subchapter;

Affirmatively order that remedial measures be taken as may be necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the purposes and intent of this subchapter;

Recover all costs, expenses, and damages to the division and any other agency or subdivision of the state in enforcing or effectuating the provisions of this subchapter, including natural resource damages;

Assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for violations of this subchapter and of any rules, permits, or plans issued pursuant to this subchapter; or

Recover civil penalties assessed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

Any person who violates any provision of this subchapter and rules, permits, or plans issued pursuant to this subchapter may be assessed an administrative civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. Each day of a continuing violation may be deemed a separate violation for purposes of civil penalty assessment. No civil penalty may be assessed until the person charged with the violation has been given the opportunity for a hearing in accordance with rules adopted by the commission. All hearings and appeals arising under this subchapter shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures prescribed by §§ 8-4-205, 8-4-212, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229. These administrative procedures may also be used to recover all costs, expenses, and damages to the division and any other agency or subdivision of the state in enforcing or effectuating the provisions of this subchapter, including natural resource damages.

As an alternative to the limits on civil penalties set in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, if a person found liable in actions brought under subsection (b) or subsection (c) of this section has derived pecuniary gain from commission of the offenses, then he or she may be ordered to pay a civil penalty equal to the amount of the pecuniary gain.

All moneys collected as reimbursement for expenses, costs, and damages to the division shall be deposited into the operating fund of the division.

All moneys collected as civil penalties pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund as provided by § 8-7-509.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, in his or her discretion, may authorize in-kind services or cash contributions as partial mitigation of cash penalties for use in projects or programs designed to advance environmental interests.

The violator may provide in-kind services or cash contributions as directed by the division by utilizing the violator's own expertise, by hiring and compensating subcontractors to perform the in-kind services, by arranging and providing financing for the in-kind services, or by other financial arrangements initiated by the division in which the violator and the division retain no monetary benefit, however remote.

The in-kind services shall not duplicate or augment services already provided by the division through appropriations of the General Assembly.

All moneys collected to cover the costs, expenses, or damages of other agencies or subdivisions of the state, including natural resource damages, shall be distributed to the appropriate governmental entity.

The culpable mental states referenced throughout this section shall have the definitions set out in § 5-2-202.

Solicitation or conspiracy, as defined by the Arkansas Criminal Code at § 5-3-301 et seq. and § 5-3-401 et seq., to commit any criminal act proscribed by this section and §§ 8-4-103 and 8-7-204 shall be punishable as follows:

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section which is a misdemeanor shall be a misdemeanor subject to fines not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per day of violation or imprisonment for more than six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment;

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section which is a felony subject to fines of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day or imprisonment up to five (5) years shall be a felony subject to fines up to thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) per day or imprisonment up to two (2) years, or both such fine and imprisonment;

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section which is a felony subject to fines of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per day or imprisonment up to ten (10) years shall be a felony subject to fines up to seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per day or imprisonment up to seven (7) years, or both such fine and imprisonment; and

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section which is a felony subject to fines of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per day or imprisonment up to twenty (20) years shall be a felony subject to fines up to one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) per day or imprisonment up to fifteen (15) years, or both such fine and imprisonment.

In cases considering suspension of sentence or probation, efforts or commitments by the defendant to remediate any adverse environmental effects caused by his or her activities may be considered by the court to be restitution as contemplated by § 5-4-301.

A business organization and its agents or officers may be found liable under this section in accordance with the standards set forth in § 5-2-501 et seq. and sentenced to pay fines in accordance with the provisions of § 5-4-201(d) and (e).

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 11; 1983, No. 666, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2711; Acts 1987, No. 529, § 2; 1991, No. 1057, §§ 4, 5; 1993, No. 731, § 4; 1995, No. 547, § 2; 1995, No. 895, § 5; 1999, No. 582, § 1; 2005, No. 1824, § 6; 2019, No. 315, §§ 522-526; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2591-2597.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, subdivision (e)(3) of this section is set out above as amended by Acts 1995, No. 895, § 5. This subdivision was also amended by Acts 1995, No. 547, § 2, to read as follows:

“(e)(3)(A)

The director, in his discretion, may accept in-kind services as partial mitigation of cash penalties for use in projects or programs designed to advance environmental interests.

“(B)

The violator may provide in-kind services as directed by the department by utilizing the violator's own expertise, by hiring and compensating subcontractors to perform the services, or by other financial arrangements in which the violator retains no monetary benefit, however remote.

“(C)

The services shall not duplicate or augment services already provided by the department through appropriations of the General Assembly.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 1057, § 1, provided: “The General Assembly finds and determines that the criminal and civil penalties imposed by current law do not accurately reflect the degree of concern which the state places upon its environmental resources. The current criminal penalties for hazardous waste and other violations are among the lowest in the nation. Civil penalties for violations of the state water, air, solid waste and hazardous waste pollution control statutes are set at the minimum necessary to receive federally delegated programs. In declaring itself “The Natural State,” the State of Arkansas demonstrated its commitment to its environmental resources. This commitment must be reflected in its environmental enforcement program. This act shall be liberally construed so as to achieve remedial intent.”

Acts 1991, No. 1057, § 5, is also codified as §§ 8-4-103(h)-(k) and 8-7-204 (f)-(i).

Acts 1993, No. 731, § 1, provided: “The State of Arkansas has an abundance of environmental concerns which need research and study, as well as concerns which have an immediate remedy but are absent funds to facilitate their implementation. This amendment serves to clarify the existing use of inkind services as penalties, to include cash contributions for use in worthy environmental projects and to advance environmental interests.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(1)(A) and (a)(2)(A)(i); deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1) and (b)(4); and in (c), deleted “regulations” preceding “rules” in the first sentence, and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the third sentence.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1)(A) and (e)(3)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Cross References.

Arkansas Criminal Code, § 5-1-101 et seq.

Penalties and procedures, § 8-6-902.

8-6-205. Illegal actions — Rebuttable presumption — Acts or omissions by third party.

It shall be illegal for any person:

To violate any provision of this subchapter or any rule or order of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission issued pursuant to this subchapter or of a permit issued under this subchapter by the Division of Environmental Quality;

To construct, install, alter, modify, use, or operate any solid waste processing or disposal facility or disposal site without a permit from the division;

To dispose of solid wastes at any disposal site or facility other than a disposal site or facility for which a permit has been issued by the division. However, no provision of this subchapter shall be construed so as to prevent an individual from disposing of solid wastes resulting from his or her own household activities on his or her own land if the disposal does not create a public or private nuisance or a hazard to health and does not violate a city ordinance or other law and does not involve the open dumping of garbage;

To dump, deposit, throw, or in any manner leave or abandon any solid wastes, including, but not limited to, garbage, tin cans, bottles, rubbish, refuse, or trash upon property owned by another person without the written permission of the owner or occupant of the property or upon any public highway, street, road, public park or recreation area, or any other public property except as designated for disposal of waste; or

To sort, collect, transport, process, or dispose of solid waste contrary to the rules or orders of the division or in such a manner or place as to create or be likely to create a public nuisance or a public health hazard or to cause or be likely to cause water or air pollution within the meaning of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq.

There is created a rebuttable presumption that shall arise in any administrative, civil, or criminal action under this subchapter to the effect that, if it can be proved that one (1) or more items of solid waste bear the name or names of one (1) or more persons in such a form as to indicate that the person or persons were the owners of those items and those items were unlawfully disposed of, then the person or persons are presumed to have committed the unlawful act of disposal.

No person shall be liable for any violation of this subchapter or of any rule or order of the commission issued pursuant to this subchapter if the violation results solely from the act or omission of a third party, unless the person has knowingly allowed the violation to occur through acquiescence, acts, or omissions.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 10; 1983, No. 666, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2710; Acts 1987, No. 730, § 1; 1989, No. 260, § 2; 1995, No. 547, § 3; 1997, No. 1206, § 1; 2001, No. 1069, § 1; 2009, No. 1199, § 6; 2019, No. 315, §§ 527-529; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2598, 2599.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “or omissions” for “and/or omissions” at the end of (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(1) and (c); and deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a)(5).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (a).

Cross References.

Theft of recyclable materials, § 5-36-121.

8-6-206. Proceedings in circuit court.

Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, a person adversely affected by a violation of this subchapter or of any rules or orders issued pursuant to this subchapter shall have a private right of action for relief against the violation.

A person may file a verified complaint in a circuit court of competent jurisdiction as described in subdivision (b)(2) of this section against a defendant if facts establish that the defendant engaged in an act or omission that results in any one (1) or more of the following in this state:

The illegal dumping of solid waste;

The creation or participation in the creation or furtherance of an illegal dump site;

The disposal of solid waste that results from the property owner's own household activities on his or her land if the disposal:

Creates a public or private nuisance or a hazard to health; or

Involves the open dumping of garbage; and

Any other environmental violation concerning the illegal dumping of solid waste in violation of this chapter or the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act, § 8-9-401 et seq.

The verified complaint shall be filed in the circuit court of the county where the:

Activity described in the verified complaint occurs;

Situation described in the verified complaint exists; or

Defendant resides.

If the plaintiff is seeking a preliminary injunction or temporary restraining order without notice to the defendant, the requirements of Rule 65(b)(1) and (c) of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure shall be met and the procedures in this subdivision (b)(3) apply.

The circuit court shall enter a temporary order that directs the defendant to perform the following within ten (10) days from the date the temporary order is served on the defendant:

Remove the solid waste from the public or private property or otherwise remediate the environmental violation;

Dispose of any solid waste or other material at:

A permitted solid waste transfer station, landfill, composting facility, or incinerator; or

A recycling center; and

File with the circuit court a disposal receipt from the permitted solid waste transfer station, landfill, composting facility, or incinerator where the solid waste was disposed.

The plaintiff shall have the temporary order served on the defendant and file proof of service with the circuit court.

To request relief from the temporary order, the defendant may file a motion with the circuit court within ten (10) days from the date the temporary order is served.

The circuit court shall hold a hearing within fourteen (14) days after the motion is filed and serve notice on all parties subject to the temporary order.

At the hearing, the circuit court shall hear all evidence and testimony and enter an order to either dismiss the original or temporary order or make the temporary order permanent.

The circuit court may grant a continuance for the hearing.

The parties at the hearing may be represented by counsel.

If subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section does not apply and notice is required, then the plaintiff shall comply with the applicable notice provisions in the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure before issuance of a temporary order.

If the temporary order is made permanent by the circuit court after a hearing on the merits or because the defendant failed to timely file a motion requesting a hearing on the served temporary order, the defendant shall within ten (10) days after its filing:

Remove or cause to be removed from the public or private property the solid waste that has been illegally dumped on the public or private property; and

Properly dispose of the solid waste in a permitted landfill or other facility approved for disposal by the Division of Environmental Quality.

If the defendant has not removed the solid waste from the public or private property and properly disposed of it after ten (10) days from the date of the filing of the order, the plaintiff or the owner of the property may cause the solid waste to be removed or otherwise remediated and file a cost statement with the circuit court.

The circuit court shall review the cost statement and determine whether the cost statement is reasonable.

If the circuit court determines the cost statement is reasonable, the circuit court shall enter an order on the judgment docket of the circuit court in the amount of the cost statement as a judgment against the defendant.

A judgment entered under this section may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment.

A judgment entered under this section is a final decision for purposes of appellate review.

In addition to any judgment ordered under this section, a party against whom a judgment has been entered under this section is subject to any other applicable criminal, civil, or administrative penalties under law or rule, or both.

The limitations and exemptions under §§ 8-6-2018 and 8-6-2019 apply to subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 237, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2712; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 530; 2019, No. 1067, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 11, provided: “(a) The purpose of this act is to have the Environmental Compliance Resource Program operational and to make illegal dump control officers unnecessary on or before May 1, 2020.

“(b)

If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws”.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 3 specifically amended this section as amended by Acts 2019, No. 315.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “any rules”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 1067 substituted “Proceedings in circuit court” for “Private right of action” in the section heading; added the designation (a); in (a), substituted “Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, a” for “Any”, and “to this subchapter” for “thereto”; and added (b) through (f).